ru: Тип петли швейной машины: Автомат (в 1 шаг); Полуавтомат (в 4 шага); Ручной; Автомат (в 1 шаг, с каркасной нитью); Сенсорная/автоматического размера; Другое
de: Knopflochtyp der Nähmaschine: 1-Stufen-Automatik; 4-Stufen; Manuell; Ein-Stufen-Knopfloch mit Garneinlage; Sensor/Automatische Größenanpassung; Andere
bg-BG: Тип илици на шевна машина: 1-стъпков автоматичен; 4-стъпков; Ръчен; Едностъпков с опция за шнур; Сензор/автоматичен размер; Друго
es: Tipo de ojal de la máquina de coser: Automático en 1 paso; En 4 pasos; Manual; Un paso con opción de cordón; Sensor/tamaño automático; Otro
fi: Ompelukoneen napinläpityyppi: 1-vaiheinen automaattinen; 4-vaiheinen; Manuaalinen; 1-vaiheinen lankavahvikkeella; Tunnistin/automaattinen koko; Muu
nb: Knapphullstype for symaskin: 1-trinns automatisk; 4-trinns; Manuell; 1-trinns med snoralternativ; Sensor/auto-størrelse; Annet
hr-HR: Vrsta rupice za gumbe na šivaćem stroju: Automatska u 1 koraku; U 4 koraka; Ručna; U jednom koraku s opcijom uzice; Sa senzorom / automatska veličina; Ostalo
fr: Type de boutonnière de la machine à coudre: 1 étape automatique; 4 étapes; Manuel; 1 étape avec option gansée; Capteur/taille automatique; Autre
da: Knaphulstype til symaskine: 1-trins automatisk; 4-trins; Manuel; Ettrins med mulighed for snor; Sensor/automatisk størrelse; Andet
ko: 재봉틀 단추구멍 유형: 1단계 자동; 4단계; 수동; 코드가 있는 1단계; 센서/자동 크기; 기타
pt-PT: Tipo de casa de botão da máquina de costura: Automático de 1 passo; De 4 passos; Manual; Um passo com opção de cordão; Sensor/tamanho automático; Outro
pl: Typ dziurek maszyny do szycia: 1-stopniowe automatyczne; 4-stopniowe; Ręczne; 1-stopniowe z opcją z kordonkiem; Z czujnikiem / automatyczny rozmiar; Inne
sk-SK: Typ gombíkovej dierky na šijacom stroji: 1-krokové automatické; 4-krokové; Manuálne; Jednokrokové s možnosťou vloženia šnúrky; Senzorové/automatická veľkosť; Iné
it: Tipo di asola della macchina da cucire: Automatico in 1 fase; A 4 fasi; Manuale; In 1 fase con opzione con cordoncino; Con sensore/Misura automatica; Altro
sl-SI: Vrsta gumbnice šivalnega stroja: Avtomatsko (v 1 koraku); V 4 korakih; Ročno; V enem koraku z vrvico; Senzor/avtomatska velikost; Drugo
tr: Dikiş makinesi ilik açma tipi: 1 adımlı otomatik; 4 adımlı; Manuel; Kordonlu seçenekli tek adımlı; Sensörlü/otomatik boyutlu; Diğer
cs: Typ knoflíkové dírky šicího stroje: Automatická (1kroková); 4kroková; Ruční; Jednokroková s možností vložení šňůrky; Se senzorem / automatická velikost; Jiné
zh-CN: 缝纫机锁眼类型: 1 步自动; 4 步; 手动; 单步（带衬绳选项）; 传感器/自动调整大小; 其他
sv: Knapphålstyp för symaskin: 1-stegs automatisk; 4-stegs; Manuell; 1-stegs med inläggstråd; Sensor/automatisk storlek; Övrigt
zh-TW: 縫紉機扣眼類型: 1 步驟自動; 4 步驟; 手動; 單步驟附帶包繩選項; 感測器/自動尺寸; 其他
ro-RO: Tip de butonieră pentru mașina de cusut: Automată într-un pas; În 4 pași; Manuală; Într-un pas cu opțiune de șnur; Cu senzor/dimensiune automată; Altele
nl: Naaimachine knoopsgattype: 1-fase automatisch; 4-fasen; Handmatig; 1-fase met gimpkoord-optie; Sensor/auto-formaat; Overig
lt-LT: Siuvimo mašinos sagos kilpos tipas: 1 žingsnio automatinė; 4 žingsnių; Rankinė; 1 žingsnio su virvele; Sensorinė / automatinio dydžio; Kita
el: Τύπος κουμπότρυπας ραπτομηχανής: Αυτόματο (1 βήματος); 4 βημάτων; Χειροκίνητο; Ενός βήματος με επιλογή κορδονιού; Με αισθητήρα/αυτόματου μεγέθους; Άλλο
en: Sewing machine buttonhole type: 1-step automatic; 4-step; Manual; One-step with corded option; Sensor/auto-size; Other
hu: Varrógép gomblyuktípusa: 1 lépéses automatikus; 4 lépéses; Kézi; Egylépéses, zsinórozott opcióval; Szenzoros / Automatikus méretezésű; Egyéb
th: ประเภทรังดุมจักรเย็บผ้า: อัตโนมัติ 1 ขั้นตอน; 4 ขั้นตอน; แบบกำหนดเอง; 1 ขั้นตอนพร้อมตัวเลือกสอดเชือก; เซนเซอร์/ปรับขนาดอัตโนมัติ; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Máquina de costura tipo de casa de botão: 1 passo (automático); 4 passos; Manual; Um passo com opção de cordão; Sensor/tamanho automático; Outro
vi: Máy may kiểu khuy: Tự động 1 bước; 4 bước; Thủ công; Một bước với tùy chọn có dây; Cảm biến/tự động định cỡ; Khác
ja: ミシンボタンホールタイプ: 1 ステップ自動; 4 ステップ; 手動; 芯入り 1 ステップ; センサー/オートサイズ; その他